New York, session 2025-2026, A8240.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (j) of subdivision 2 of section 2851 of the 2 education law, as added by chapter 4 of the laws of 1998, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 (j) Information regarding the facilities to be used by the school, 5 including the location of the school, if known, and the means by which 6 pupils will be transported to and from the school. Such information 7 shall include a traffic study that evaluates the potential impact of the 8 proposed charter school on traffic patterns, safety and congestion in 9 the surrounding area. If the facilities to be used by the proposed 10 school are not known at the time the application is submitted, the 11 applicant shall notify the charter entity and, if applicable, the board 12 of regents within ten business days of acquiring facilities for such 13 school and such traffic study required pursuant to this paragraph must 14 be submitted prior to approval of an application; provided, however, 15 that the charter school must obtain a certificate of occupancy for such 16 facilities prior to the date on which instruction is to commence at the 17 school. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02922-01-5